Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Fees

47-25-60.
Collection of fees; accurate records.

In addition to all other legal costs, the sum of $3.00 shall be charged and collected in each civil matter or proceeding filed in the magistrate courts.

The clerks of the magistrate courts shall collect the fees provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section and the fees so collected shall be remitted to the board on a quarterly basis or at such time as the board may provide. It shall be the duty of the clerks to keep accurate records of the amounts due the board under this Code section and such records may be audited by the board at any time. The sums remitted to the board under this Code section shall be used for the purposes provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244.